Illinois, session 104th, SB3634.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 9.02 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/9.02)  (from Ch. 127, par. 145c)7    Sec. 9.02. Vouchers; signature; delegation; electronic 8submission. 9    (a)(1) Other than construction contracts procured by the 10Department of Transportation under paragraph (1.5), any Any 11new contract or contract renewal in the amount of $250,000 or 12more in a fiscal year, or any order against a master contract 13in the amount of $250,000 or more in a fiscal year, or any 14contract amendment or change to an existing contract that 15increases the value of the contract to or by $250,000 or more 16in a fiscal year, shall be signed or approved in writing by the 17chief executive officer of the agency or his or her designee, 18and shall also be signed or approved in writing by the agency's 19chief legal counsel or his or her designee and chief fiscal 20officer or his or her designee. If the agency does not have a 21chief legal counsel or a chief fiscal officer, the chief 22executive officer of the agency shall designate in writing a 23senior executive as the individual responsible for signature   SB3634- 2 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1or approval.2    (1.5) For construction contracts procured by the 3Department of Transportation on or after the effective date of 4this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 5signature requirement under paragraph (1) shall apply to 6contracts, contract renewals, and orders against a master 7contract in the amount of $750,000 or more in a fiscal year and 8to any contract amendment or change to an existing contract 9that increases the value of the contract to or by $750,000 or 10more in a fiscal year. 11    (2) No document identified in paragraph (1) may be filed 12with the Comptroller, nor may any authorization for payment 13pursuant to such documents be filed with the Comptroller, if 14the required signatures or approvals are lacking.15    (3) Any person who, with knowledge the signatures or 16approvals required in paragraph (1) are lacking, either files 17or directs another to file documents or payment authorizations 18in violation of paragraph (2) shall be subject to discipline 19up to and including discharge.20    (4) Procurements shall not be artificially divided so as 21to avoid the necessity of complying with paragraph (1).22    (5) Each State agency shall develop and implement 23procedures to ensure the necessary signatures or approvals are 24obtained. Each State agency may establish, maintain and follow 25procedures that are more restrictive than those required 26herein.  SB3634- 3 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    (6) This subsection (a) applies to all State agencies as 2defined in Section 1-7 of the Illinois State Auditing Act, 3which includes without limitation the General Assembly and its 4agencies. For purposes of this subsection (a), in the case of 5the General Assembly, the "chief executive officer of the 6agency" means (i) the Senate Operations Commission for Senate 7general operations as provided in Section 4 of the General 8Assembly Operations Act, (ii) the Speaker of the House of 9Representatives for House general operations as provided in 10Section 5 of the General Assembly Operations Act, (iii) the 11Speaker of the House for majority leadership staff and 12operations, (iv) the Minority Leader of the House for minority 13leadership staff and operations, (v) the President of the 14Senate for majority leadership staff and operations, (vi) the 15Minority Leader of the Senate for minority staff and 16operations, and (vii) the Joint Committee on Legislative 17Support Services for the legislative support services agencies 18as provided in the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act 19of 1984. For purposes of this subsection (a), in the case of 20agencies, the "chief executive officer of the agency" means 21the head of the agency. 22    (b)(1) Every voucher or corresponding balancing report, as 23submitted by the agency or office in which it originates, 24shall bear (i) the signature of the officer responsible for 25approving and certifying vouchers under this Act and (ii) if 26authority to sign the responsible officer's name has been   SB3634- 4 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1properly delegated, also the signature of the person actually 2signing the voucher.3    (2) When an officer delegates authority to approve and 4certify vouchers, he shall send a copy of such authorization 5containing the signature of the person to whom delegation is 6made to each office that checks or approves such vouchers and 7to the State Comptroller. Such delegation may be general or 8limited. If the delegation is limited, the authorization shall 9designate the particular types of vouchers that the person is 10authorized to approve and certify.11    (3) When any delegation of authority hereunder is revoked, 12a copy of the revocation of authority shall be sent to the 13Comptroller and to each office to which a copy of the 14authorization was sent.15    The Comptroller may require State agencies to maintain 16signature documents and records of delegations of voucher 17signature authority and revocations of those delegations, 18instead of transmitting those documents to the Comptroller. 19The Comptroller may inspect such documents and records at any 20time.21    (c) The Comptroller may authorize the submission of 22vouchers through electronic transmissions, on magnetic tape, 23or otherwise.24(Source: P.A. 101-34, eff. 6-28-19; 101-359, eff. 8-9-19; 25102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB3634- 5 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    Section 10. The Public Contract Fraud Act is amended by 2changing Section 2 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 545/2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.52)4    Sec. 2. Spending money without obtaining title to land; 5approval of title by Attorney General. 6    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 2 of the 7Superconducting Super Collider Act or for projects constructed 8under the Bikeway Act, any person or persons, commissioner or 9commissioners, or other officer or officers, entrusted with 10the construction or repair of any public work or improvement, 11as set forth in Section 1, who shall expend or cause to be 12expended upon such public work or improvement, the whole or 13any part of the moneys appropriated therefor, or who shall 14commence work, or in any way authorize work to be commenced, 15thereon, without first having obtained a title, by purchase, 16donation, condemnation or otherwise, to all lands needed for 17such public work or improvement, running to the People of the 18State of Illinois; such title to be approved by the Attorney 19General, and his approval certified by the Secretary of State 20and placed on record in his office, shall be deemed guilty of a 21Class A misdemeanor.22    (b) Approval of title by the Attorney General for all 23lands needed for a public work or improvement shall not be 24required as established under subsection (a) of this Section 25and the State Comptroller may draw warrant in payment of   SB3634- 6 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1consideration for all such lands without requiring approval of 2title by the Attorney General if consideration to be paid does 3not exceed $25,000 and the title acquired for such lands is 4for:5        (1) a fee simple title or easement acquired by the 6    State for highway right-of-way; or7        (2) an acquisition of rights or easements of access, 8    crossing, light, air or view to, from or over a freeway 9    vested in abutting property; or 10        (3) a fee simple title or easement used to place 11    utility lines and connect a permanent public work or 12    improvement owned by the State to main utility lines; or13        (4) for the purpose of flood relief or other water 14    resource projects.15    (c) This Section does not apply to any otherwise lawful 16expenditures for the construction, completion, remodeling, 17maintenance and equipment of buildings and other facilities 18made in connection with and upon premises owned by the 19Illinois Building Authority, nor shall this Section apply to 20improvements to real estate leased by any State agency as 21defined in the Illinois State Auditing Act, provided the 22leasehold improvements were contracted for by an agency with 23leasing authority and in compliance with the rules and 24regulations promulgated by such agency for that purpose.25    (d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Department of 26Transportation may proceed with bidding or awarding a contract   SB3634- 7 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1or any construction activities once it has complied with the 2requirements for conditional certification under 23 CFR 3635.309(c)(3). The Department of Transportation shall comply 4with the requirements under subsection (a) before expending 5funds on construction activities or property acquisition 6related to parcels that were outstanding at the time of 7conditional certification under this subsection (d). No 8construction activities shall be undertaken on any property 9until the requirements under subsection (a) have been met for 10that property. No delay costs shall be assessed against the 11State until the Department of Transportation has complied with 12subsection (a).13(Source: P.A. 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 14    Section 15. The Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 152002 is amended by changing Sections 1-10, 5-5, 5-30, 15-10, 1615-10.1, 15-11, 15-15, and 25-10 as follows: 17    (225 ILCS 458/1-10)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)19    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 20context otherwise requires:21    "Accredited college or university, junior college, or 22community college" means a college or university, junior 23college, or community college that is approved or accredited 24by the Board of Higher Education, a regional or national   SB3634- 8 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1accreditation association, or by an accrediting agency that is 2recognized by the U.S. Secretary of Education. 3    "Address of record" means the designated street address, 4which may not be a post office box, recorded by the Department 5in the applicant's or licensee's application file or license 6file as maintained by the Department.7    "Applicant" means a person who applies to the Department 8for a license under this Act.9    "Appraisal" means (noun) the act or process of developing 10an opinion of value; an opinion of value (adjective) of or 11pertaining to appraising and related functions, such as 12appraisal practice or appraisal services.13    "Appraisal assignment" means a valuation service provided 14pursuant to an agreement between an appraiser and a client.15    "Appraisal firm" means an appraisal entity that is 100% 16owned and controlled by a person or persons licensed in 17Illinois as a certified general real estate appraiser or a 18certified residential real estate appraiser. "Appraisal firm" 19does not include an appraisal management company. 20    "Appraisal management company" means any corporation, 21limited liability company, partnership, sole proprietorship, 22subsidiary, unit, or other business entity that directly or 23indirectly: (1) provides appraisal management services to 24creditors or secondary mortgage market participants, including 25affiliates; (2) provides appraisal management services in 26connection with valuing the consumer's principal dwelling as   SB3634- 9 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1security for a consumer credit transaction (including consumer 2credit transactions incorporated into securitizations); and 3(3) any appraisal management company that, within a given 412-month period, oversees an appraiser panel of 16 or more 5State-certified appraisers in Illinois or 25 or more 6State-certified or State-licensed appraisers in 2 or more 7jurisdictions. "Appraisal management company" includes a 8hybrid entity. 9    "Appraisal practice" means valuation services performed by 10an individual acting as an appraiser, including, but not 11limited to, appraisal or appraisal review. 12    "Appraisal qualification board (AQB)" means the 13independent board of the Appraisal Foundation, which, under 14the provisions of Title XI of the Financial Institutions 15Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, establishes the 16minimum education, experience, and examination requirements 17for real property appraisers to obtain a state certification 18or license. 19    "Appraisal report" means any communication, written or 20oral, of an appraisal or appraisal review that is transmitted 21to a client upon completion of an assignment.22    "Appraisal review" means the act or process of developing 23and communicating an opinion about the quality of another 24appraiser's work that was performed as part of an appraisal, 25appraisal review, or appraisal assignment. 26    "Appraisal Subcommittee" means the Appraisal Subcommittee   SB3634- 10 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council as 2established by Title XI.3    "Appraiser" means a person who performs real estate or 4real property appraisals competently and in a manner that is 5independent, impartial, and objective.6    "Appraiser panel" means a network, list, or roster of 7licensed or certified appraisers approved by the appraisal 8management company or by the end-user client to perform 9appraisals as independent contractors for the appraisal 10management company. "Appraiser panel" includes both appraisers 11accepted by an appraisal management company for consideration 12for future appraisal assignments and appraisers engaged by an 13appraisal management company to perform one or more 14appraisals. For the purposes of determining the size of an 15appraiser panel, only independent contractors of hybrid 16entities shall be counted towards the appraiser panel. 17    "Associate real estate trainee appraiser" means an 18entry-level appraiser who holds a license of this 19classification under this Act with restrictions as to the 20scope of practice in accordance with this Act.21    "Automated valuation model" means an automated system that 22is used to derive a property value through the use of available 23property records and various analytic methodologies such as 24comparable sales prices, home characteristics, and price 25changes. 26    "Board" means the Real Estate Appraisal Administration and   SB3634- 11 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1Disciplinary Board.2    "Broker price opinion" means an estimate or analysis of 3the probable selling price of a particular interest in real 4estate, which may provide a varying level of detail about the 5property's condition, market, and neighborhood and information 6on comparable sales. The activities of a real estate broker or 7managing broker engaging in the ordinary course of business as 8a broker, as defined in this Section, shall not be considered a 9broker price opinion if no compensation is paid to the broker 10or managing broker, other than compensation based upon the 11sale or rental of real estate. 12    "Classroom hour" means 50 minutes of instruction out of 13each 60-minute segment of coursework.14    "Client" means the party or parties who engage an 15appraiser by employment or contract in a specific appraisal 16assignment.17    "Comparative market analysis" is an analysis or opinion 18regarding pricing, marketing, or financial aspects relating to 19a specified interest or interests in real estate that may be 20based upon an analysis of comparative market data, the 21expertise of the real estate broker or managing broker, and 22such other factors as the broker or managing broker may deem 23appropriate in developing or preparing such analysis or 24opinion. The activities of a real estate broker or managing 25broker engaging in the ordinary course of business as a 26broker, as defined in this Section, shall not be considered a   SB3634- 12 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1comparative market analysis if no compensation is paid to the 2broker or managing broker, other than compensation based upon 3the sale or rental of real estate. 4    "Coordinator" means the Real Estate Appraisal Coordinator 5created in Section 25-15. 6    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 7Professional Regulation. 8    "Email address of record" means the designated email 9address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 10application file or the licensee's license file maintained by 11the Department. 12    "Evaluation" means a valuation permitted by the appraisal 13regulations of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination 14Council and its federal agencies for transactions that qualify 15for the appraisal threshold exemption, business loan 16exemption, or subsequent transaction exemption.17    "Federal financial institutions regulatory agencies" means 18the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the 19Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Office of the 20Comptroller of the Currency, the Consumer Financial Protection 21Bureau, and the National Credit Union Administration.22    "Federally related transaction" means any real 23estate-related financial transaction in which a federal 24financial institutions regulatory agency engages in, contracts 25for, or regulates and requires the services of an appraiser.26    "Financial institution" means any bank, savings bank,   SB3634- 13 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1savings and loan association, credit union, mortgage broker, 2mortgage banker, licensee under the Consumer Installment Loan 3Act or the Sales Finance Agency Act, or a corporate fiduciary, 4subsidiary, affiliate, parent company, or holding company of 5any such licensee, or any institution involved in real estate 6financing that is regulated by state or federal law.7    "Hybrid entity" means an appraisal management company that 8hires an appraiser as an employee to perform an appraisal and 9engages an independent contractor to perform an appraisal.10    "License" means the privilege conferred by the Department 11to a person that has fulfilled all requirements prerequisite 12to any type of licensure under this Act.13    "Licensee" means any person licensed under this Act. 14    "Multi-state licensing system" means a web-based platform 15that allows an applicant to submit the application or license 16renewal application to the Department online. 17    "Person" means an individual, entity, sole proprietorship, 18corporation, limited liability company, partnership, and joint 19venture, foreign or domestic, except that when the context 20otherwise requires, the term may refer to more than one 21individual or other described entity. 22    "Real estate" means an identified parcel or tract of land, 23including any improvements.24    "Real estate related financial transaction" means any 25transaction involving:26        (1) the sale, lease, purchase, investment in, or   SB3634- 14 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    exchange of real property, including interests in property 2    or the financing thereof;3        (2) the refinancing of real property or interests in 4    real property; and5        (3) the use of real property or interest in property 6    as security for a loan or investment, including mortgage 7    backed securities.8    "Real property" means the interests, benefits, and rights 9inherent in the ownership of real estate.10    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 11Professional Regulation or the Secretary's designee. 12    "State certified general real estate appraiser" means an 13appraiser who holds a license of this classification under 14this Act and such classification applies to the appraisal of 15all types of real property without restrictions as to the 16scope of practice.17    "State certified residential real estate appraiser" means 18an appraiser who holds a license of this classification under 19this Act and such classification applies to the appraisal of 20one to 4 units of residential real property without regard to 21transaction value or complexity, but with restrictions as to 22the scope of practice in a federally related transaction in 23accordance with Title XI, the provisions of USPAP, criteria 24established by the AQB, and further defined by rule.25    "Supervising appraiser" means either (i) an appraiser who 26holds a valid license under this Act as either a State   SB3634- 15 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1certified general real estate appraiser or a State certified 2residential real estate appraiser, who co-signs an appraisal 3report for an associate real estate trainee appraiser or (ii) 4a State certified general real estate appraiser who holds a 5valid license under this Act who co-signs an appraisal report 6for a State certified residential real estate appraiser on 7properties other than one to 4 units of residential real 8property without regard to transaction value or complexity. 9    "Title XI" means Title XI of the federal Financial 10Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.11    "USPAP" means the Uniform Standards of Professional 12Appraisal Practice as promulgated by the Appraisal Standards 13Board pursuant to Title XI and by rule.14    "Valuation services" means services pertaining to aspects 15of property value. 16    "Waiver valuation" means a valuation prepared pursuant to 17the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 18Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended, or pursuant to 19the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 20Acquisition for Federal and Federally Assisted Programs 21regulations under 49 CFR Part 24 that is not an appraisal or 22represented as an appraisal. 23(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 24102-970, eff. 5-27-22; 103-236, eff. 1-1-24.) 25    (225 ILCS 458/5-5)  SB3634- 16 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)2    Sec. 5-5. Necessity of license; use of title; exemptions. 3    (a) It is unlawful for a person to (i) act, offer services, 4or advertise services as a State certified general real estate 5appraiser, State certified residential real estate appraiser, 6or associate real estate trainee appraiser, (ii) develop a 7real estate appraisal, (iii) practice as a real estate 8appraiser, or (iv) advertise as a real estate appraiser 9without a license issued under this Act. A person who violates 10this subsection is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first 11offense and a Class 4 felony for any subsequent offense.12    (a-5) It is unlawful for a person, unless registered as an 13appraisal management company, to solicit clients or enter into 14an appraisal engagement with clients without either a 15certified residential real estate appraiser license or a 16certified general real estate appraiser license issued under 17this Act. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a 18Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 4 felony 19for any subsequent offense. 20    (b) It is unlawful for a person, other than a person who 21holds a valid license issued pursuant to this Act as a State 22certified general real estate appraiser, a State certified 23residential real estate appraiser, or an associate real estate 24trainee appraiser to use these titles or any other title, 25designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression 26that the person is licensed as a real estate appraiser   SB3634- 17 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1pursuant to this Act. A person who violates this subsection is 2guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 34 felony for any subsequent offense.4    (c) This Act does not apply to a person who holds a valid 5license as a real estate broker or managing broker pursuant to 6the Real Estate License Act of 2000 who prepares or provides a 7broker price opinion or comparative market analysis in 8compliance with Section 10-45 of the Real Estate License Act 9of 2000.10    (d) Nothing in this Act shall preclude a State certified 11general real estate appraiser, a State certified residential 12real estate appraiser, or an associate real estate trainee 13appraiser from rendering appraisals for or on behalf of a 14partnership, association, corporation, firm, or group. 15However, no State appraisal license or certification shall be 16issued under this Act to a partnership, association, 17corporation, firm, or group. 18    (e) This Act does not apply to a county assessor, township 19assessor, multi-township assessor, county supervisor of 20assessments, or any deputy or employee of any county assessor, 21township assessor, multi-township assessor, or county 22supervisor of assessments in performance of respective duties 23in accordance with the provisions of the Property Tax Code. 24    (e-5) For the purposes of this Act, waiver valuations 25valuation waivers may be prepared by a licensed appraiser 26notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, and the   SB3634- 18 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1following types of valuations are not appraisals and may not 2be represented to be appraisals, and a license or 3certification is not required under this Act to perform such 4valuations if the valuations are created in one of the 5following manners: performed by (1) an employee of the 6Illinois Department of Transportation who has completed a 7minimum of 45 hours of course work in real estate appraisal, 8including the principles of real estate appraisals, appraisal 9of partial acquisitions, easement valuation, reviewing 10appraisals in eminent domain, appraisal for federal aid 11highway programs, and appraisal review for federal aid highway 12programs and has at least 2 years' experience in a field 13closely related to real estate; (2) a county engineer who is a 14registered professional engineer under the Professional 15Engineering Practice Act of 1989; (3) an employee of a 16municipality who has (i) completed a minimum of 45 hours of 17coursework in real estate appraisal, including the principles 18of real estate appraisals, appraisal of partial acquisitions, 19easement valuation, reviewing appraisals in eminent domain, 20appraisal for federal aid highway programs, and appraisal 21review for federal aid highway programs and (ii) has either 2 22years' experience in a field clearly related to real estate or 23has completed 20 hours of additional coursework that is 24sufficient for a person to complete waiver valuations as 25approved by the Federal Highway Administration; or (4) a 26municipal engineer who has completed coursework that is   SB3634- 19 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1sufficient for waiver valuations to be approved by the Federal 2Highway Administration and who is a registered professional 3engineer under the Professional Engineering Act of 1989, under 4the following circumstances: 5        (A) a waiver valuation waiver in an amount not to 6    exceed $35,000 that $20,000 prepared pursuant to the 7    federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 8    Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, or prepared pursuant to 9    the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real 10    Property Acquisition for Federal and Federally-Assisted 11    Programs regulations and which is performed by:12            (1) an employee of the Illinois Department of 13        Transportation who is a registered professional 14        engineer under the Professional Engineering Practice 15        Act of 1989 or an employee of the Illinois Department 16        of Transportation who is and co-signed, with a license 17        number affixed, by another employee of the Illinois 18        Department of Transportation and who is a registered 19        professional engineer under the Professional 20        Engineering Practice Act of 1989, with a license 21        number affixed;22            (2) an employee of the Illinois Department of 23        Transportation or an employee of a consultant or 24        subconsultant under contract to provide land 25        acquisition services to the Illinois Department of 26        Transportation who has at least 2 years of experience   SB3634- 20 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1        in a field closely related to real estate and who has 2        completed a minimum of 45 hours of course work in real 3        estate appraisal, including the principles of real 4        estate appraisals, appraisal of partial acquisitions, 5        easement valuation, reviewing appraisals in eminent 6        domain, appraisal for federal aid highway programs, 7        and appraisal review for federal aid highway programs;8            (3) a county or municipal engineer who is a 9        registered professional engineer under the 10        Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, with an 11        engineer's signature and license number affixed;12            (4) a municipal engineer who has completed 13        coursework that is sufficient for waiver valuations to 14        be approved by the Federal Highway Administration and 15        who is a registered professional engineer under the 16        Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989;17            (5) or (2) an employee of a county or municipality 18        who is and co-signed with a license number affixed by 19        the applicable a county or municipal engineer who is a 20        registered professional engineer under the 21        Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, with a 22        license number affixed;23            (6) an employee of a municipality who:24                (A) has completed a minimum of 45 hours of 25            coursework in real estate appraisal, including the 26            principles of real estate appraisals, appraisal of   SB3634- 21 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1            partial acquisitions, easement valuation, 2            reviewing appraisals in eminent domain, appraisal 3            for federal aid highway programs, and appraisal 4            review for federal aid highway programs; and5                (B) has either 2 years of experience in a 6            field clearly related to real estate or has 7            completed 20 hours of additional coursework that 8            is sufficient for the employee to complete waiver 9            valuations as approved by the Federal Highway 10            Administration; or11            (7) a nonresident appraiser licensed in another 12        jurisdiction who does not represent himself or herself 13        to be an Illinois-licensed appraiser; or and14        (B) a waiver valuation waiver in an amount not to 15    exceed $50,000 that (i) is performed by a licensed 16    certified general real estate appraiser, a licensed 17    certified residential real estate appraiser, or an 18    associate real estate trainee appraiser employed by the 19    Illinois Department of Transportation, (ii) includes the 20    signature and license numbers of the appraiser or the 21    trainee and the trainee's supervising appraiser, and (iii) 22    is co-signed by an employee of the Illinois Department of 23    Transportation who is a registered professional engineer 24    under the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, 25    with a license number affixed $20,000 prepared pursuant to 26    the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real   SB3634- 22 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, or prepared 2    pursuant to the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and 3    Real Property Acquisition for Federal and 4    Federally-Assisted Programs regulations and which is 5    performed by a county or municipal engineer who is 6    employed by a county or municipality and is a registered 7    professional engineer under the Professional Engineering 8    Practice Act of 1989. The valuation shall include the 9    county or municipal engineer's signature and license 10    number.11    Nothing in this subsection (e-5) shall be construed to 12allow the State of Illinois, a political subdivision thereof, 13or any public body to acquire real estate by eminent domain in 14any manner other than provided for in the Eminent Domain Act. 15    (f) A State real estate appraisal certification or license 16is not required under this Act for any person, partnership, 17association, or corporation that performs appraisals of 18property owned by that person, partnership, association, or 19corporation for the sole use of that person, partnership, 20association, or corporation. 21    Any person who is certified or licensed under this Act and 22who performs any of the activities set forth in this 23subsection (f) must comply with the provisions of this Act. A 24person who violates this subsection (f) is guilty of a Class A 25misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 4 felony for any 26subsequent offense.  SB3634- 23 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    (g) This Act does not apply to an employee, officer, 2director, or member of a credit or loan committee of a 3financial institution or any other person engaged by a 4financial institution when performing an evaluation of real 5property for the sole use of the financial institution in a 6transaction for which the financial institution would not be 7required to use the services of a State licensed or State 8certified appraiser pursuant to federal regulations adopted 9under Title XI of the federal Financial Institutions Reform, 10Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.11    (h) This Act does not apply to the procurement of an 12automated valuation model. 13(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 14    (225 ILCS 458/5-30)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)16    Sec. 5-30. Endorsement. The Department may issue an 17appraiser license, without the required examination, to an 18applicant licensed by another state, territory, possession of 19the United States, or the District of Columbia, if (i) the 20licensing requirements of that licensing authority are, on the 21date of licensure, substantially equal to the requirements set 22forth under this Act or to a person who, at the time of the 23application, possessed individual qualifications that were 24substantially equivalent to the requirements of this Act and 25or (ii) the applicant provides the Department with evidence of   SB3634- 24 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1good standing from the Appraisal Subcommittee National 2Registry report and a criminal history records check in 3accordance with Section 5-22. An applicant under this Section 4shall pay all of the required fees.5(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 6    (225 ILCS 458/15-10)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 15-10. Grounds for disciplinary action. 9    (a) The Department may suspend, revoke, refuse to issue, 10renew, or restore a license and may reprimand, place on 11probation or administrative supervision, or take any 12disciplinary or non-disciplinary action, including imposing 13conditions limiting the scope, nature, or extent of the real 14estate appraisal practice of a licensee or reducing the 15appraisal rank of a licensee, and may impose an administrative 16fine not to exceed $25,000 for each violation upon a licensee 17or applicant under this Act or any person who holds oneself out 18as an applicant or licensee for any one or combination of the 19following:20        (1) Procuring or attempting to procure a license by 21    knowingly making a false statement, submitting false 22    information, engaging in any form of fraud or 23    misrepresentation, or refusing to provide complete 24    information in response to a question in an application 25    for licensure.  SB3634- 25 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1        (2) Failing to meet the minimum qualifications for 2    licensure as an appraiser established by this Act.3        (3) Paying money, other than for the fees provided for 4    by this Act, or anything of value to a member or employee 5    of the Board or the Department to procure licensure under 6    this Act.7        (4) Conviction of, or plea of guilty or nolo 8    contendere, as enumerated in subsection (e) of Section 9    5-22, under the laws of any jurisdiction of the United 10    States to: (i) that is a felony, misdemeanor, or 11    administrative sanction or (ii) that is a crime that 12    subjects the licensee to compliance with the requirements 13    of the Sex Offender Registration Act.14        (5) Committing an act or omission involving 15    dishonesty, fraud, or misrepresentation with the intent to 16    substantially benefit the licensee or another person or 17    with intent to substantially injure another person as 18    defined by rule.19        (6) Violating a provision or standard for the 20    development or communication of real estate appraisals as 21    provided in Section 10-10 of this Act or as defined by 22    rule.23        (7) Failing or refusing without good cause to exercise 24    reasonable diligence in developing, reporting, or 25    communicating an appraisal, as defined by this Act or by 26    rule.  SB3634- 26 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1        (8) Violating a provision of this Act or the rules 2    adopted pursuant to this Act.3        (9) Having been disciplined by another state, the 4    District of Columbia, a territory, a foreign nation, a 5    governmental agency, or any other entity authorized to 6    impose discipline if at least one of the grounds for that 7    discipline is the same as or the equivalent of one of the 8    grounds for which a licensee may be disciplined under this 9    Act.10        (10) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 11    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 12    defraud, or harm the public.13        (11) Accepting an appraisal assignment when the 14    employment itself is contingent upon the appraiser 15    reporting a predetermined estimate, analysis, or opinion 16    or when the fee to be paid is contingent upon the opinion, 17    conclusion, or valuation reached or upon the consequences 18    resulting from the appraisal assignment.19        (12) Developing valuation conclusions based on the 20    race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, 21    age, marital status, family status, physical or mental 22    disability, sexual orientation, pregnancy, order of 23    protection status, military status, unfavorable military 24    discharge, source of income, or any other protected class, 25    as defined under the Illinois Human Rights Act, of the 26    prospective or present owners or occupants of the area or   SB3634- 27 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    property under appraisal.2        (13) Violating the confidential nature of government 3    records to which the licensee gained access through 4    employment or engagement as an appraiser by a government 5    agency.6        (14) Being adjudicated liable in a civil proceeding on 7    grounds of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit. In a 8    disciplinary proceeding based upon a finding of civil 9    liability, the appraiser shall be afforded an opportunity 10    to present mitigating and extenuating circumstances, but 11    may not collaterally attack the civil adjudication.12        (15) Being adjudicated liable in a civil proceeding 13    for violation of a state or federal fair housing law.14        (16) Engaging in misleading or untruthful advertising 15    or using a trade name or insignia of membership in a real 16    estate appraisal or real estate organization of which the 17    licensee is not a member.18        (17) Failing to fully cooperate with a Department 19    investigation by knowingly making a false statement, 20    submitting false or misleading information, or refusing to 21    provide complete information in response to written 22    interrogatories or a written request for documentation 23    within 30 days of the request.24        (18) Failing to include within the certificate of 25    appraisal for all written appraisal reports the 26    appraiser's license number and licensure title. All   SB3634- 28 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    appraisers providing significant contribution to the 2    development and reporting of an appraisal must be 3    disclosed in the appraisal report. It is a violation of 4    this Act for an appraiser to sign a report, transmittal 5    letter, or appraisal certification knowing that a person 6    providing a significant contribution to the report has not 7    been disclosed in the appraisal report.8        (19) Violating the terms of a disciplinary order or 9    Consent consent to Administrative Supervision 10    administrative supervision order.11        (20) Habitual or excessive use or addiction to 12    alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical 13    agent or drug that results in a licensee's inability to 14    practice with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety that 15    may result in significant harm to the public.16        (21) A physical or mental illness or disability which 17    results in the inability to practice under this Act with 18    reasonable judgment, skill, or safety. 19        (22) Gross negligence in developing an appraisal or in 20    communicating an appraisal or failing to observe one or 21    more of the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal 22    Practice.23        (23) A pattern of practice or other behavior that 24    demonstrates incapacity or incompetence to practice under 25    this Act.26        (24) Using or attempting to use the seal, certificate,   SB3634- 29 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    or license of another as one's own; falsely impersonating 2    any duly licensed appraiser; using or attempting to use an 3    inactive, expired, suspended, or revoked license; or 4    aiding or abetting any of the foregoing.5        (25) Solicitation of professional services by using 6    false, misleading, or deceptive advertising.7        (26) Making a material misstatement in furnishing 8    information to the Department.9        (27) Failure to furnish information to the Department 10    upon written request. 11    (b) The Department may reprimand suspend, revoke, or 12refuse to issue or renew an education provider's license, may 13reprimand, place on probation, or otherwise discipline an 14education provider, and may suspend or revoke the course 15approval of any course offered by an education provider and 16may impose an administrative fine not to exceed $25,000 upon 17an education provider, for any of the following:18        (1) Procuring or attempting to procure licensure by 19    knowingly making a false statement, submitting false 20    information, engaging in any form of fraud or 21    misrepresentation, or refusing to provide complete 22    information in response to a question in an application 23    for licensure.24        (2) Failing to comply with the covenants certified to 25    on the application for licensure as an education provider.26        (3) Committing an act or omission involving   SB3634- 30 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    dishonesty, fraud, or misrepresentation or allowing any 2    such act or omission by any employee or contractor under 3    the control of the provider.4        (4) Engaging in misleading or untruthful advertising.5        (5) Failing to retain competent instructors in 6    accordance with rules adopted under this Act.7        (6) Failing to meet the topic or time requirements for 8    course approval as the provider of a qualifying curriculum 9    course or a continuing education course.10        (7) Failing to administer an approved course using the 11    course materials, syllabus, and examinations submitted as 12    the basis of the course approval.13        (8) Failing to provide an appropriate classroom 14    environment for presentation of courses, with 15    consideration for student comfort, acoustics, lighting, 16    seating, workspace, and visual aid material.17        (9) Failing to maintain student records in compliance 18    with the rules adopted under this Act.19        (10) Failing to provide a certificate, transcript, or 20    other student record to the Department or to a student as 21    may be required by rule.22        (11) Failing to fully cooperate with an investigation 23    by the Department by knowingly making a false statement, 24    submitting false or misleading information, or refusing to 25    provide complete information in response to written 26    interrogatories or a written request for documentation   SB3634- 31 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    within 30 days of the request.2    (c) In appropriate cases, the Department may resolve a 3complaint against a licensee through the issuance of a Consent 4to Administrative Supervision order. A licensee subject to a 5Consent to Administrative Supervision order shall be 6considered by the Department as an active licensee in good 7standing. This order shall not be reported or considered by 8the Department to be a discipline of the licensee. The records 9regarding an investigation and a Consent to Administrative 10Supervision order shall be considered confidential and shall 11not be released by the Department except as mandated by law. 12(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22; 103-236, eff. 1-1-24; 13revised 6-24-25.) 14    (225 ILCS 458/15-10.1)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)16    Sec. 15-10.1. Citations.17    (a) The Department may adopt rules to permit the issuance 18of citations to any licensee for failure to comply with the 19continuing education requirements set forth in this Act or as 20established by rule. The citation shall be issued to the 21licensee. For associate real estate trainee appraisers, a copy 22shall also be sent to the licensee's supervising appraiser of 23record. The citation shall contain the licensee's name, the 24licensee's address, the licensee's license number, the number 25of required hours of continuing education that have not been   SB3634- 32 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1successfully completed by the licensee's licensee within the 2renewal deadline period, and the penalty imposed, which shall 3not exceed $2,000. The issuance of a citation shall not excuse 4the licensee from completing all continuing education required 5for that renewal period.6    (b) Service of a citation shall be made in person, 7electronically, or by mail to the licensee at the licensee's 8address of record or email address of record and . Service of a 9citation must clearly state that if the cited licensee wishes 10to dispute the citation, the cited licensee may make a written 11request, within 30 days after the citation is served, for a 12hearing before the Department. If the cited licensee does not 13request a hearing within 30 days after the citation is served, 14then the citation shall become a final, non-disciplinary order 15shall be entered, and any fine imposed is due and payable 16within 30 60 days after the entry of that final order. If the 17cited licensee requests a hearing within 30 days after the 18citation is served, the Department shall afford the cited 19licensee a hearing conducted in the same manner as a hearing 20provided for in this Act for any violation of this Act and 21shall determine whether the cited licensee committed the 22violation as charged and whether the fine as levied is 23warranted. If the violation is found, any fine shall 24constitute non-public discipline and be due and payable within 2530 days after the order of the Secretary, which shall 26constitute a final order of the Department. No change in   SB3634- 33 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1license status may be made by the Department until a final 2order of the Department has been issued.3    (c) Payment of a fine that has been assessed pursuant to 4this Section shall not constitute disciplinary action 5reportable on the Department's website or elsewhere unless a 6licensee has previously received 2 or more citations and been 7assessed 2 or more fines.8    (d) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit or limit the 9Department from taking further action pursuant to this Act and 10rules for additional, repeated, or continuing violations.11(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 12    (225 ILCS 458/15-11)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)14    Sec. 15-11. Illegal discrimination. 15    (a) When there has been an adjudication in a civil or 16criminal proceeding that a licensee has illegally 17discriminated while engaged in any activity for which a 18license is required under this Act, the Department, following 19notice to the licensee and a hearing in accordance with the 20provisions of Section 15-15 and upon the recommendation of the 21Board as to the extent of the suspension or revocation, shall 22suspend or revoke the license of that licensee in a timely 23manner, unless the adjudication is in the appeal process. The 24finding or judgment of the civil or criminal proceeding is a 25matter of record, the merits of which shall not be challenged   SB3634- 34 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1in a request for a hearing by the licensee. 2    (b) When there has been an order in an administrative 3proceeding finding that a licensee has illegally discriminated 4while engaged in any activity for which a license is required 5under this Act, the Department, following notice to the 6licensee and a hearing in accordance with the provisions of 7Section 15-15 and upon recommendation of the Board as to the 8nature and extent of the discipline, shall take one or more of 9the disciplinary actions provided for in Section 15-10 in a 10timely manner, unless the administrative order is in the 11appeal process. The finding of the administrative order is a 12matter of record, the merits of which shall not be challenged 13in a request for a hearing by the licensee. 14(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 15    (225 ILCS 458/15-15)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)17    Sec. 15-15. Investigation; notice; hearing. 18    (a) Upon the motion of the Department or the Board or upon 19a complaint in writing of a person setting forth facts that, if 20proven, would constitute grounds for suspension, revocation, 21or other disciplinary action, the Department shall investigate 22the actions or qualifications of any person who is a licensee, 23applicant for licensure, unlicensed person, person rendering 24or offering to render appraisal services, or person holding or 25claiming to hold a license under this Act. If, upon   SB3634- 35 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1investigation, the Department believes that there may be cause 2for suspension, revocation, or other disciplinary action, the 3Department may shall use the services of a State certified 4general real estate appraiser, a State certified residential 5real estate appraiser, or the Coordinator to assist in 6determining whether grounds for disciplinary action exist 7prior to commencing formal disciplinary proceedings. 8    (b) Formal disciplinary proceedings shall commence upon 9the issuance of a written complaint describing the charges 10that are the basis of the disciplinary action and delivery of 11the detailed complaint to the most recent address of record or 12email address of record of the person charged as provided to 13the Department. For an associate real estate trainee 14appraiser, a copy shall also be sent to the licensee's 15supervising appraiser of record at the supervising appraiser's 16most recent address of record or email address of record as 17provided to the Department. The Department shall notify the 18person to file a verified written answer within 20 days after 19the service of the notice and complaint. The notification 20shall inform the person of the right to be heard in person or 21by legal counsel; that the hearing will be afforded not sooner 22than 20 days after service of the complaint; that failure to 23file an answer after the service of notice will result in a 24default being entered against the person; that the license may 25be suspended, revoked, or placed on probationary status; and 26that the Department may take whatever other disciplinary   SB3634- 36 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1action may be taken pursuant to this Act, including limiting 2the scope, nature, or extent of the licensee's practice 3without a hearing. If the person fails to file an answer after 4service of notice, the respective license may, at the 5discretion of the Department, be suspended, revoked, or placed 6on probationary status and the Department may take whatever 7disciplinary action it deems proper, including limiting the 8scope, nature, or extent of the person's practice, without a 9hearing.10    (c) At the time and place fixed in the notice, the 11Department Board shall conduct a hearing of the charges, 12providing both the person charged and the complainant ample 13opportunity to present in person or by counsel such 14statements, testimony, evidence, and argument as may be 15pertinent to the charges or to a defense thereto.16    (c-5) The Secretary shall have the authority to appoint 17any attorney duly licensed to practice law in the State of 18Illinois to serve as the hearing officer in any action to 19suspend, revoke, or otherwise discipline any license issued by 20the Department. The hearing officer shall have full authority 21to conduct the hearing.22    There may be present one or more members of the Board at 23any such hearing. The hearing officer shall report his or her 24findings of fact, conclusions of law and recommendations to 25the Board and the Secretary. The Board shall have 60 days from 26receipt of the report to review the report of the hearing   SB3634- 37 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1officer and present its findings of fact, conclusions of law, 2and recommendations to the Secretary. If the Board fails to 3present its findings of fact, conclusions of law, and 4recommendations within the 60-day period, the Department may 5request in writing a direct appeal to the Secretary, in which 6case the Secretary may issue an order based upon the report of 7the hearing officer and the record of the proceedings or issue 8an order remanding the matter back to the hearing officer for 9additional proceedings in accordance with the order. If the 10Board fails to present its findings of fact, conclusions of 11law, and recommendations within a 60-day period after 12receiving an Order of Default, the Department may request in 13writing a direct appeal to the Secretary. 14    (d) The Board shall present to the Secretary a written 15report of its findings of fact and recommendations. A copy of 16the report shall be served upon the person either by mail or, 17at the discretion of the Department, by electronic means. For 18associate real estate trainee appraisers, a copy shall also be 19sent to the licensee's supervising appraiser of record. Within 2020 days after the service, the person may present to the 21Department Secretary with a motion in writing for a rehearing 22that specifies and shall specify the particular grounds for 23the request. If the person orders a transcript of the record 24from the applicable reporting service and pays for the 25transcript within the 20-day period for filing a motion for 26rehearing, the 20-day period shall restart upon the delivery   SB3634- 38 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1of the transcript. 2    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 3if the Secretary, upon review, determines that substantial 4justice has not been done in the revocation, suspension, or 5refusal to issue or renew a license or any other disciplinary 6action taken as a result of the entry of the hearing officer's 7report, the Secretary may order a rehearing by the Board or 8other special committee appointed by the Secretary or may 9remand the matter to the Board for its reconsideration of the 10matter based on the pleadings and evidence presented to the 11Board. If the Secretary disagrees in any regard with the 12report of the Board or the hearing officer, the Secretary may 13issue an order in contravention of the Board or the hearing 14officer. If the person orders a transcript of the record as 15provided in this Act, the time elapsing thereafter and before 16the transcript is ready for delivery to the person shall not be 17counted as part of the 20 days. If the Secretary is not 18satisfied that substantial justice has been done, the 19Secretary may order a rehearing by the Board or other special 20committee appointed by the Secretary, may remand the matter to 21the Board for its reconsideration of the matter based on the 22pleadings and evidence presented to the Board, or may enter a 23final order in contravention of the Board's recommendation. 24Notwithstanding a person's failure to file a motion for 25rehearing, the Secretary shall have the right to take any of 26the actions specified in this subsection (d). Upon the   SB3634- 39 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1suspension or revocation of a license, the licensee shall be 2required to surrender the respective license to the 3Department, and upon failure or refusal to do so, the 4Department shall have the right to seize the license.5    (e) The Department has the power to issue subpoenas and 6subpoenas duces tecum to bring before it any person in this 7State, to take testimony, or to require production of any 8records relevant to an inquiry or hearing by the Board in the 9same manner as prescribed by law in judicial proceedings in 10the courts of this State. In a case of refusal of a witness to 11attend, testify, or to produce books or papers concerning a 12matter upon which the witness might be lawfully examined, the 13circuit court of the county where the hearing is held, upon 14application of the Department or any party to the proceeding, 15may compel obedience by proceedings as for contempt.16    (f) Any license that is revoked may not be restored for a 17minimum period of 3 years.18    (g) In addition to the provisions of this Section 19concerning the conduct of hearings and the recommendations for 20discipline, the Department has the authority to negotiate 21disciplinary and non-disciplinary settlement agreements 22concerning any license issued under this Act. All such 23agreements shall be recorded as Consent Orders or Consent to 24Administrative Supervision Orders.25    (h) (Blank). The Secretary shall have the authority to 26appoint an attorney duly licensed to practice law in the State   SB3634- 40 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1of Illinois to serve as the hearing officer in any action to 2suspend, revoke, or otherwise discipline any license issued by 3the Department. The Hearing Officer shall have full authority 4to conduct the hearing.5    (i) The Department, at its expense, shall preserve a 6record of all formal hearings of any contested case involving 7the discipline of a license. At all hearings or pre-hearing 8conferences, the Department and the licensee shall be entitled 9to have the proceedings transcribed by a certified shorthand 10reporter. A copy of the transcribed proceedings shall be made 11available to the licensee by the certified shorthand reporter 12upon payment of the prevailing contract copy rate.13(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22; 102-970, eff. 5-27-22; 14103-236, eff. 1-1-24; revised 6-24-25.) 15    (225 ILCS 458/25-10)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)17    Sec. 25-10. Real Estate Appraisal Administration and 18Disciplinary Board; appointment. 19    (a) There is hereby created the Real Estate Appraisal 20Administration and Disciplinary Board. The Board shall be 21composed of the Coordinator and 10 persons appointed by the 22Governor. Members shall be appointed to the Board subject to 23the following conditions:24        (1) All appointed members shall have been residents 25    and citizens of this State for at least 5 years prior to   SB3634- 41 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    the date of appointment.2        (2) The appointed membership of the Board should 3    reasonably reflect the geographic distribution of the 4    population of the State.5        (3) Four appointed members shall have been actively 6    engaged and currently licensed as State certified general 7    real estate appraisers for a period of not less than 5 8    years. 9        (4) Three appointed members shall have been actively 10    engaged and currently licensed as State certified 11    residential real estate appraisers for a period of not 12    less than 5 years.13        (5) One appointed member shall hold a valid license as 14    a real estate broker for at least 3 years prior to the date 15    of the appointment and shall hold either a valid State 16    certified general real estate appraiser license or a valid 17    State certified residential appraiser license issued under 18    this Act or a predecessor Act for a period of at least 5 19    years prior to the appointment.20        (6) One appointed member shall be a representative of 21    a financial institution, as evidenced by proof of 22    employment with a financial institution.23        (7) One appointed member shall represent the interests 24    of the general public. This member or the member's spouse 25    shall not be licensed under this Act nor be employed by or 26    have any financial interest in an appraisal business,   SB3634- 42 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1    appraisal management company, real estate brokerage 2    business, or a financial institution.3    In making appointments as provided in paragraphs (3) and 4(4) of this subsection, the Governor shall give due 5consideration to recommendations by members and organizations 6representing the profession.7    In making the appointments as provided in paragraph (5) of 8this subsection, the Governor shall give due consideration to 9the recommendations by members and organizations representing 10the real estate industry.11    In making the appointment as provided in paragraph (6) of 12this subsection, the Governor shall give due consideration to 13the recommendations by members and organizations representing 14financial institutions.15    (b) The members' terms shall be for 4 years or until a 16successor is appointed. No member shall be reappointed to the 17Board for a term that would cause the member's cumulative 18service to the Board to exceed 12 years. Appointments to fill 19vacancies shall be for the unexpired portion of the term. 20    (c) The Governor may terminate the appointment of a member 21for cause that, in the opinion of the Governor, reasonably 22justifies the termination. Cause for termination may include, 23without limitation, misconduct, incapacity, neglect of duty, 24or missing 4 Board meetings during any one fiscal year.25    (d) A majority of the Board members shall constitute a 26quorum. A vacancy in the membership of the Board shall not   SB3634- 43 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1impair the right of a quorum to exercise all of the rights and 2perform all of the duties of the Board.3    (e) The Board shall meet at least monthly and may be 4convened by the Chairperson, Vice-Chairperson, or 3 members of 5the Board upon 10 days written notice.6    (f) The Board shall, annually at the first meeting of the 7fiscal year, elect a Chairperson and Vice-Chairperson from its 8members. The Chairperson shall preside over the meetings and 9shall coordinate with the Coordinator in developing and 10distributing an agenda for each meeting. In the absence of the 11Chairperson, the Vice-Chairperson shall preside over the 12meeting.13    (g) The Coordinator shall serve as a member of the Board 14without vote.15    (h) The Board shall advise and make recommendations to the 16Department on the education and experience qualifications of 17any applicant for initial licensure as a State certified 18general real estate appraiser or a State certified residential 19real estate appraiser. The Department shall not make any 20decisions concerning education or experience qualifications of 21an applicant for initial licensure as a State certified 22general real estate appraiser or a State certified residential 23real estate appraiser without having first received the advice 24and recommendation of the Board and shall give due 25consideration to all such advice and recommendations; however, 26if the Board does not render advice or make a recommendation   SB3634- 44 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1within a reasonable amount of time, then the Department may 2render a decision. 3    (i) Except as provided in Section 15-17 of this Act, the 4Board shall hear and make recommendations to the Secretary on 5disciplinary matters that require a formal evidentiary 6hearing. The Secretary shall give due consideration to the 7recommendations of the Board involving discipline and 8questions involving standards of professional conduct of 9licensees.10    (j) The Department shall seek and the Board shall provide 11recommendations to the Department consistent with the 12provisions of this Act and for the administration and 13enforcement of all rules adopted pursuant to this Act. The 14Department shall give due consideration to such 15recommendations prior to adopting rules.16    (k) The Department shall seek and the Board shall provide 17recommendations to the Department on the approval of all 18courses submitted to the Department pursuant to this Act and 19the rules adopted pursuant to this Act. The Department shall 20not approve any courses without having first received the 21recommendation of the Board and shall give due consideration 22to such recommendations prior to approving and licensing 23courses; however, if the Board does not make a recommendation 24within a reasonable amount of time, then the Department may 25approve courses.26    (l) Each voting member of the Board may receive a per diem   SB3634- 45 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1stipend in an amount to be determined by the Secretary. While 2engaged in the performance of duties, each member shall be 3reimbursed for necessary expenses.4    (m) Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in an 5action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other acts 6performed in good faith as members of the Board.7    (n) If the Department disagrees with any advice or 8recommendation provided by the Board under this Section to the 9Secretary or the Department, then notice of such disagreement 10must be provided to the Board by the Department. 11    (o) (Blank). 12(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 1-1-22; 102-970, eff. 5-27-22; 13103-236, eff. 1-1-24.) 14    Section 20. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 15changing Section 4-501 as follows: 16    (605 ILCS 5/4-501)  (from Ch. 121, par. 4-501)17    Sec. 4-501. The Department, in its name, or any county may 18acquire the fee simple title, or such lesser interest as may be 19desired, to any public or private land, rights, or other 20property necessary for the construction, maintenance or 21operation of State highways, or necessary for locating, 22relocating, extending, widening or straightening any State 23highway, or necessary for locating, relocating, extending, 24widening or straightening an existing street or for laying   SB3634- 46 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1out, establishing or opening a new street within the corporate 2limits of any municipality which has been designated by the 3Department as a street to form a part of or to connect with a 4State highway leading up to the corporate limits of such 5municipality, or necessary for any other purpose or use 6contemplated by this Code by purchase or by the exercise of the 7right of eminent domain under the eminent domain laws of this 8State and the Department shall not be required, in any case, to 9furnish bond.10    When, in the judgment of the acquiring agency, it is more 11practical and economical to acquire the fee to the 12inaccessible remnants of the tracts of land from which 13rights-of-way are being acquired than to pay severance 14damages, such agency may do so by purchase or by an eminent 15domain proceeding.16    When a part of a parcel of land is to be taken for State 17highway purposes and the accessible remnant is to be left in a 18shape or condition rendering it of little value to the owner or 19giving rise to claims for severance or other damages, upon 20written request of the owner, the acquiring agency may take 21the whole parcel and may sell or exchange the part not needed 22for highway purposes.23    When acquiring land for a highway on a new location, and 24when a parcel of land one acre or less in area contains a 25single family residence, which is in conformance with existing 26zoning ordinances, and only a part of that parcel is required   SB3634- 47 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1for State highway purposes causing the remainder of the parcel 2not to conform with the existing zoning ordinances, or when 3the location of the right of way line of the proposed highway 4reduces the distance from an existing single family residence 5to the right of way line to 10 feet or less, the acquiring 6agency shall, if the owner so demands, take the whole parcel by 7negotiation or condemnation. The part not needed for highway 8purposes may be rented, sold or exchanged by the acquiring 9agency.10    When any farm land is acquired for State highway purposes 11by the exercise of the right of eminent domain, the rate of 12compensation to be paid by the acquiring agency shall be 13computed by taking into consideration the total acreage 14originally involved in the farm land parcel, including that 15portion of such parcel already part of a right of way for 16highway purposes but for which legal title lies in the owner of 17the parcel.18(Source: P.A. 81-536.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.  SB3634- 48 -LRB104 19988 AAS 33439 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    30 ILCS 105/9.02from Ch. 127, par. 145c4    30 ILCS 545/2from Ch. 127, par. 132.525    225 ILCS 458/1-106    225 ILCS 458/5-57    225 ILCS 458/5-308    225 ILCS 458/15-109    225 ILCS 458/15-10.110    225 ILCS 458/15-1111    225 ILCS 458/15-1512    225 ILCS 458/25-1013    605 ILCS 5/4-501from Ch. 121, par. 4-501